Arkansas, session 2025, SB567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-5-101, Article IV, concerning the
division of income under the Multistate Tax Compact, is amended to read as
follows:
ARTICLE IV
Division of Income

1. As used in this Article, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Business income” means income arising from
*JLL351*
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
transactions and activity in the regular course of the taxpayer's trade or
business and includes income from tangible and intangible property if the
acquisition, management, and disposition of the property constitute integral
parts of the taxpayer's regular trade or business operation "Apportionable
income" means:
(1) All income that is apportionable under the
United States Constitution and is not allocated under the laws of this state,
including:
(A) Income arising from transactions and
activity in the regular course of the taxpayer's trade or business; and
(B) Income arising from tangible and
intangible property if the acquisition, management, employment, development,
or disposition of the property is or was related to the operation of the
taxpayer’s trade or business; and
(2) Any income that would be allocable to this
state under the United States Constitution, but that is apportioned rather
than allocated pursuant to the laws of this state;
(b) “Commercial domicile” means the principal place
from which the trade or business of the taxpayer is directed or managed;
(c) “Compensation” means wages, salaries,
commissions, and any other form of remuneration paid to employees for
personal services;
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) “Nonbusiness Nonapportionable income” means all
income other than business apportionable income;
(f) “Public utility” means any business entity (1)
which owns or operates any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license
for the transmission of communications, transportation of goods or persons,
except by pipeline, or the production, transmission, sale, delivery, or
furnishing of electricity, water, or steam; and (2) whose rates of charges
for goods or services have been established or approved by a federal, state,
or local government or governmental agency;
(g) “Sales” "Receipts" means all gross receipts of
the taxpayer not allocated under paragraphs 4 through 8 of this article and
that are received from transactions and activity in the regular course of the
taxpayer’s trade or business; except that receipts of a taxpayer from hedging
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
transactions and from the maturity, redemption, sale, exchange, loan or other
disposition of cash or securities shall be excluded;
(h) “State” means any state of the United States,
the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or
possession of the United States, and any foreign country or political
subdivision thereof;
(i) “This state” means the state in which the
relevant tax return is filed or, in the case of application of this article
to the apportionment and allocation of income for local tax purposes, the
subdivision or local taxing district in which the relevant tax return is
filed State of Arkansas.
2. Any taxpayer having income from business activity
which is taxable both within and without this state, other than activity as a
railroad or public utility or the rendering of purely personal services by an
individual, shall allocate and apportion his net income as provided in this
article. If a taxpayer has income from business activity as a public utility
but derives the greater percentage of his income from activities subject to
this article, the taxpayer may elect to allocate and apportion his entire net
income as provided in this article.
3. For purposes of allocation and apportionment of income
under this article, a taxpayer is taxable in another state if (1) in that
state he the taxpayer is subject to a net income tax, a franchise tax
measured by net income, a franchise tax for the privilege of doing business,
or a corporate stock tax, or (2) that state has jurisdiction to subject the
taxpayer to a net income tax regardless of whether, in fact, the state does
or does not or any other tax measured by income or other measure of business
activity in the state and the taxpayer files the requisite tax return in the
other state, or (2) the state has no net income tax, franchise tax measured
by net income, or any other tax measured by income or other measure of
business activity in the state as provided in this section and the taxpayer
has activities in the other state that exceed those protected by 15 U.S.C. §§
381 — 384.
4. Rents and royalties from real or tangible personal
property, capital gains, interest, dividends, or patent or copyright
royalties, to the extent that they constitute nonbusiness nonapportionable
income, shall be allocated as provided in paragraphs 5 through 8 of this
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
article.
5.(a) Net rents and royalties from real property located
in this state are allocable to this state.
(b) Net rents and royalties from tangible personal
property are allocable to this state: (1) if and to the extent that the
property is utilized in this state, or (2) in their entirety if the
taxpayer's commercial domicile is in this state and the taxpayer is not
organized under the laws of or taxable in the state in which the property is
utilized.
(c) The extent of utilization of tangible personal
property in a state is determined by multiplying the rents and royalties by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days of physical location
of the property in the state during the rental or royalty period in the
taxable year and the denominator of which is the number of days of physical
location of the property everywhere during all rental or royalty periods in
the taxable year. If the physical location of the property during the rental
or royalty period is unknown or unascertainable by the taxpayer, tangible
personal property is utilized in the state in which the property was located
at the time the rental or royalty payer obtained possession.
6.(a) Capital gains and losses from sales of real property
located in this state are allocable to this state.
(b) Capital gains and losses from sales of tangible
personal property are allocable to this state if (1) the property had a situs
in this state at the time of the sale, or (2) the taxpayer's commercial
domicile is in this state and the taxpayer is not taxable in the state in
which the property had a situs.
(c) Capital gains and losses from sales of
intangible personal property are allocable to this state if the taxpayer's
commercial domicile is in this state.
7. Interest and dividends are allocable to this state if
the taxpayer's commercial domicile is in this state.
8.(a) Patent and copyright royalties are allocable to this
state: (1) if and to the extent that the patent or copyright is utilized by
the payer in this state, or (2) if and to the extent that the patent
copyright is utilized by the payer in the state in which the taxpayer is not
taxable and the taxpayer's commercial domicile is in this state.
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
(b) A patent is utilized in a state to the extent
that it is employed in production, fabrication, manufacturing, or other
processing in the state or to the extent that a patented product is produced
in the state. If the basis of receipts from patent royalties does not permit
allocation to states or if the accounting procedures do not reflect states of
utilization, the patent is utilized in the state in which the taxpayer's
commercial domicile is located.
(c) A copyright is utilized in a state to the
extent that printing or other publication originates in the state. If the
basis of receipts from copyright royalties does not permit allocation to
states or if the accounting procedures do not reflect states of utilization,
the copyright is utilized in the state in which the taxpayer's commercial
domicile is located.
9. For the tax year beginning January 1, 2021, all
business All apportionable income shall be apportioned to this state by
multiplying the income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the total
sales receipts of the taxpayer in this state during the tax period and the
denominator of which is the total sales receipts of the taxpayer everywhere
during the tax period.
10. [Repealed.]
11. [Repealed.]
12. [Repealed.]
13. [Repealed.]
14. [Repealed.]
15. [Repealed.]
16. Sales Receipts from the sale of tangible personal
property are in this state if:
(a) The property is delivered or shipped to a
purchaser within this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other
conditions of the sale; or
(b) The property is shipped from an office, store,
warehouse, factory, or other place of storage in this state and the taxpayer
is not taxable in the state of the purchaser, in which case the sales
receipts shall be sourced as follows:
(1) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2024, sales receipts shall be sourced eighty-five and seventy-one hundredths
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
percent (85.71%) within this state and fourteen and twenty-nine hundredths
percent (14.29%) outside this state;
(2) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2025, sales receipts shall be sourced seventy-one and forty-two hundredths
percent (71.42%) within this state and twenty-eight and fifty-eight
hundredths percent (28.58%) outside this state;
(3) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2026, sales receipts shall be sourced fifty-seven and thirteen hundredths
percent (57.13%) within this state and forty-two and eighty-seven hundredths
percent (42.87%) outside this state;
(4) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2027, sales receipts shall be sourced forty-two and eighty-four hundredths
percent (42.84%) within this state and fifty-seven and sixteen hundredths
percent (57.16%) outside this state;
(5) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2028, sales receipts shall be sourced twenty-eight and fifty-five hundredths
percent (28.55%) within this state and seventy-one and forty-five hundredths
percent (71.45%) outside this state;
(6) For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2029, sales receipts shall be sourced fourteen and twenty-six hundredths
percent (14.26%) within this state and eighty-five and seventy-four
hundredths percent (85.74%) outside this state; and
(7) For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2030, sales receipts shall be sourced one hundred percent (100%)
outside this state.
17. Sales, other than sales of tangible personal
property, are in this state if:
(a) The income-producing activity is performed in
this state; or
(b) The income-producing activity is performed both
in and outside this state and a greater proportion of the income-producing
activity is performed in this state than in any other state, based on costs
of performance.
(a) Receipts, other than receipts described in
subsection 16 of this section, are in this state if the taxpayer’s market for
the sales is in this state. The taxpayer’s market for sales is in this state:
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
(1) In the case of sale, rental, lease, or
license of real property, if and to the extent the property is located in
this state;
(2) In the case of rental, lease, or license
of tangible personal property, if and to the extent the property is located
in this state;
(3) In the case of sale of a service, if and
to the extent the service is delivered to a location in this state; and
(4) In the case of intangible property:
(A) That is rented, leased, or licensed,
if and to the extent the property is used in this state, provided that
intangible property utilized in marketing a good or service to a consumer is
used in this state if that good or service is purchased by a consumer who is
in this state; and
(B) That is sold, if and to the extent
the property is used in this state, provided that:
(i) A contract right, government
license, or similar intangible property that authorizes the holder to conduct
a business activity in a specific geographic area is used in this state if
the geographic area includes all or part of this state;
(ii) Receipts from intangible
property sales that are contingent on the productivity, use, or disposition
of the intangible property shall be treated as receipts from the rental,
lease, or licensing of such intangible property under subsection
17(a)(4)(B)(i) of this article; and
(iii) All other receipts from a
sale of intangible property shall be excluded from the numerator and
denominator of the receipts factor.
(b) If the state or states of assignment under
subsection 17(a) of this article cannot be determined, the state or states of
assignment shall be reasonably approximated.
(c) If the taxpayer is not taxable in a state to
which a receipt is assigned under subsection 17(a) or subsection 17(b) of
this article, or if the state of assignment cannot be determined under
subsection 17(a) of this article or reasonably approximated under subsection
17(b) of this article, such receipt shall be excluded from the denominator of
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
the receipts factor.
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may prescribe rules as necessary or appropriate to carry out
the purposes of this article.
(e)(1) Notwithstanding subsection 17(a) of this
article, a person that is principally engaged in the sale of
telecommunications service, mobile telecommunications service, internet
access service, cable television service, community antenna television
service, or direct-to-home satellite television programming service, or a
combination of these services, may elect to source sales under this
subsection 17(e) for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but
before December 31, 2035.
(2) An election under this subsection 17(e)
shall be made on the taxpayer’s return for the first tax year for which the
taxpayer is eligible for the election, and once made, an election under this
subsection 17(e) cannot be changed for subsequent years without approval in
writing by the secretary.
(3) Under this subsection 17(e), sales, other
than sales described in subsection 16 of this article, are in this state if:
(A) The income-producing activity is
performed in this state; or
(B) The income-producing activity is
performed both in and outside this state and a greater proportion of the
income-producing activity is performed in this state than in any other state,
based on costs of performance.
18.(a) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of
this Article do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's business
activity in this state, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax
administrator secretary may require, in respect to all or any part of the
taxpayer's business activity, if reasonable:
(a)(1) Separate accounting;
(b)(2) The inclusion of one (1) or more
additional factors which will fairly represent the taxpayer's business
activity in this state; or
(c)(3) The employment of any other method to
effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
income.
(b)(1) If the allocation and apportionment
provisions of this article do not fairly represent the extent of business
activity in this state of taxpayers engaged in a particular industry or in a
particular transaction or activity, the secretary, in addition to the
authority provided in subsection 18(a) of this article, may establish
appropriate rules for determining alternative allocation and apportionment
methods for the taxpayers.
(2) A rule adopted under this subsection 18(b)
shall be applied uniformly, except that with respect to any taxpayer to which
the rule applies, the taxpayer may petition for or the secretary may require
an adjustment under subsection 18(a) of this article.
(c) The party petitioning for or the secretary
requiring the use of any method to effectuate an equitable allocation and
apportionment of the taxpayer’s income under subsection 18(a) of this article
shall prove that the:
(1) Allocation and apportionment provisions of
this article do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s business
activity in this state; and
(2) Alternative to the allocation and
apportionment provisions of this article is reasonable.
(d) The same burden of proof shall apply whether the
taxpayer is petitioning for or the secretary is requiring the use of any
reasonable method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of
the taxpayer’s income.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection 18(d) of this
article, if the secretary demonstrates that in any two (2) of the prior five
(5) tax years, the taxpayer used an allocation or apportionment method at
variance with the allocation or apportionment method or methods the taxpayer
used for the other tax years, then the secretary shall not bear the burden of
proof in imposing a different allocation or apportionment method under
subsection 18(a) of this article.
(f) If the secretary requires a different allocation
or apportionment method under subsection 18(a) of this article to effectuate
an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income, the
secretary shall not impose a civil or criminal penalty with reference to the
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
tax due that is attributable to the taxpayer’s reasonable reliance solely on
the allocation and apportionment provisions of this article.
(g) A taxpayer that has received written permission
from the secretary to use a reasonable method of allocation or apportionment
to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s
income shall not have that permission revoked with respect to transactions
and activities that have already occurred unless there has been a material
change in or a material misrepresentation of the facts provided by the
taxpayer upon which the secretary reasonably relied.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-202, concerning the income taxation of
nonresidents, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) The income of a nonresident corporation or partnership with no
physical presence in the state through real or personal property, employees,
agents, representatives, or otherwise shall be subject to tax under this
chapter if the nonresident's Arkansas receipts under §§ 26-51-701 — 26-51-718
exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the current or the
immediately preceding tax year.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-701 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-701. Definitions.
As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) “Business income” means income arising from transactions and
activity in the regular course of the taxpayer's trade or business and
includes income from tangible and intangible property if the acquisition,
management, and disposition of the property constitute integral parts of the
taxpayer's regular trade or business operations "Apportionable income" means:
(1) All income that is apportionable under the United
States Constitution and is not allocated under the laws of this state,
including:
(A) income arising from transactions and activity in
the regular course of the taxpayer's trade or business; and
(B) income arising from tangible and intangible
property if the acquisition, management, employment, development, or
disposition of the property is or was related to the operation of the
taxpayer’s trade or business; and
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
(2) Any income that would be allocable to this state under
the United States Constitution, but that is apportioned rather than allocated
pursuant to the laws of this state.
(b) “Commercial domicile” means the principal place from which
the trade or business of the taxpayer is directed or managed.
(c) “Compensation” means wages, salaries, commissions, and any
other form of remuneration paid to employees for personal services.
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) “Nonbusiness Nonapportionable income” means all income other
than business apportionable income.
(f) “Public utility” means any business entity which owns or
operates for public use any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license
for the transmission of communications, transportation of goods or persons,
or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of
electricity, water, steam, oil, oil products, or gas.
(g) “Sales” "Receipts" means all gross receipts of the taxpayer
not allocated under §§ 26-51-704 — 26-51-708 and that are received from
transactions and activity in the regular course of the taxpayer’s trade or
business; except that receipts of a taxpayer from hedging transactions and
from the maturity, redemption, sale, exchange, loan, or other disposition of
cash or securities shall be excluded.
(h) “State” means any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of
the United States, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.
(i) "This state" means the State of Arkansas.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-51-704 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-704. Nonbusiness Nonapportionable income.
Rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital
gains, interest, dividends, or patent or copyright royalties, to the extent
that they constitute nonbusiness nonapportionable income, shall be allocated
as provided in §§ 26-51-705 — 26-51-708.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-51-709 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-709. Business Apportionable income.
For the tax year beginning January 1, 2021, all business All
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
apportionable income shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the
income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales receipts of
the taxpayer in this state during the tax period and the denominator of which
is the total sales receipts of the taxpayer everywhere during the tax period.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code §§ 26-51-716 — 26-51-718 are amended to read
as follows:
26-51-716. Sales Receipts from sales of tangible personal property.
Sales Receipts from sales of tangible personal property are in this
state if:
(a) the property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser within
this state regardless of the f.o.b. point or other conditions of the sale; or
(b) the property is shipped from an office, store, warehouse,
factory, or other place of storage in this state and the taxpayer is not
taxable in the state of the purchaser, in which case the sales receipts shall
be sourced as follows:
(1) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2024, sales
receipts shall be sourced eighty-five and seventy-one hundredths percent
(85.71%) within this state and fourteen and twenty-nine hundredths percent
(14.29%) outside this state;
(2) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2025, sales
receipts shall be sourced seventy-one and forty-two hundredths percent
(71.42%) within this state and twenty-eight and fifty-eight hundredths
percent (28.58%) outside this state;
(3) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2026, sales
receipts shall be sourced fifty-seven and thirteen hundredths percent
(57.13%) within this state and forty-two and eighty-seven hundredths percent
(42.87%) outside this state;
(4) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2027, sales
receipts shall be sourced forty-two and eighty-four hundredths percent
(42.84%) within this state and fifty-seven and sixteen hundredths percent
(57.16%) outside this state;
(5) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2028, sales
receipts shall be sourced twenty-eight and fifty-five hundredths percent
(28.55%) within this state and seventy-one and forty-five hundredths percent
(71.45%) outside this state;
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
(6) For the tax year beginning on January 1, 2029, sales
receipts shall be sourced fourteen and twenty-six hundredths percent (14.26%)
within this state and eighty-five and seventy-four hundredths percent
(85.74%) outside this state; and
(7) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2030,
sales receipts shall be sourced one hundred percent (100%) outside this
state.

26-51-717. Sales — Income-producing activity Receipts — Market for
sales.
Sales, other than sales of tangible personal property, are in this
state if:
(a) the income-producing activity is performed in this state; or
(b) the income-producing activity is performed both within and
without the state, in which event the portion of income allocable to this
state shall be the percentage that is used in the formula for allocating
income to Arkansas during the year of the sale.
(a) Receipts, other than receipts of sales of tangible personal
property, are in this state if the taxpayer’s market for the sales is in this
state. The taxpayer’s market for sales is in this state:
(1) in the case of sale, rental, lease, or license of real
property, if and to the extent the property is located in this state;
(2) in the case of rental, lease, or license of tangible
personal property, if and to the extent the property is located in this
state;
(3) in the case of sale of a service, if and to the extent the
service is delivered to a location in this state; and
(4) in the case of intangible property:
(A) that is rented, leased, or licensed, if and to the
extent the property is used in this state, provided that intangible property
utilized in marketing a good or service to a consumer is used in this state
if that good or service is purchased by a consumer in this state; and
(B) that is sold, if and to the extent the property is
used in this state, provided that:
(i) a contract right, government license, or similar
intangible property that authorizes the holder to conduct a business activity
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
in a specific geographic area is used in this state if the geographic area
includes all or part of this state;
(ii) receipts from intangible property sales that
are contingent on the productivity, use, or disposition of the intangible
property shall be treated as receipts from the rental, lease, or licensing of
such intangible property under subdivision (a)(4)(B)(i) of this section; and
(iii) all other receipts from a sale of intangible
property shall be excluded from the numerator and denominator of the receipts
factor.
(b) If the state or states of assignment under subsection (a) of this
section cannot be determined, the state or states of assignment shall be
reasonably approximated.
(c) If the taxpayer is not taxable in a state to which a receipt is
assigned under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, or if the
state of assignment cannot be determined under subsection (a) of this section
or reasonably approximated under subsection (b) of this section, such
receipts shall be excluded from the denominator of the receipts factor.
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may
prescribe rules as necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this
section.
(e)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a person that
is principally engaged in the sale of telecommunications service, mobile
telecommunications service, internet access service, cable television
service, community antenna television service, or direct-to-home satellite
television programming service, or a combination of these services, may elect
to source sales under this subsection for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, but before December 31, 2035.
(2) An election under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall
be made on the taxpayer’s return for the first tax year for which the
taxpayer is eligible for the election, and once made, an election under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section cannot be changed for subsequent years
without approval in writing by the secretary.
(3) Under this subsection, sales, other than sales described in
§ 26-51-716, are in this state if:
(A) The income-producing activity is performed in this
state; or
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
(B) The income-producing activity is performed both in and
outside this state and a greater proportion of the income-producing activity
is performed in this state than in any other state, based on costs of
performance.

26-51-718. Procedure when allocation does not fairly represent
taxpayer's business activity.
(a) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this Act do not
fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's business activity in this
state, the taxpayer may petition for or the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration may require, in respect to all or any part of the
taxpayer's business activity, if reasonable:
(a)(1) separate accounting;
(b)(2) the inclusion of one or more additional factors
which will fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in this state;
or
(c)(3) the employment of any other method to effectuate an
equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
(b)(1) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this Act do
not fairly represent the extent of business activity in this state of
taxpayers engaged in a particular industry or in a particular transaction or
activity, the secretary, in addition to the authority provided in subsection
(a) of this section, may establish appropriate rules for determining
alternative allocation and apportionment methods for the taxpayers.
(2) A rule adopted under this subsection shall be applied
uniformly, except that with respect to any taxpayer to which the rule
applies, the taxpayer may petition for or the secretary may require an
adjustment under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The party petitioning for or the secretary requiring the use of
any method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the
taxpayer’s income under subsection (a) of this section shall prove that the:
(1) Allocation and apportionment provisions of this Act do not
fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s business activity in this
state; and
(2) Alternative to the allocation and apportionment provisions
of this Act is reasonable.
03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351

SB567
(d) The same burden of proof shall apply whether the taxpayer is
petitioning for or the secretary is requiring the use of any reasonable
method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the
taxpayer’s income.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, if the secretary
demonstrates that in any two (2) of the prior five (5) tax years the taxpayer
used an allocation or apportionment method at variance with the allocation or
apportionment method or methods the taxpayer used for the other tax years,
then the secretary shall not bear the burden of proof in imposing a different
allocation or apportionment method under subsection (a) of this section.
(f) If the secretary requires a different allocation or apportionment
method under subsection (a) of this section to effectuate an equitable
allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income, the secretary shall
not impose a civil or criminal penalty with reference to the tax due that is
attributable to the taxpayer’s reasonable reliance solely on the allocation
and apportionment provisions of this Act.
(g) A taxpayer that has received written permission from the secretary
to use a reasonable method of allocation or apportionment to effectuate an
equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income shall not
have that permission revoked with respect to transactions and activities that
have already occurred unless there has been a material change in or a
material misrepresentation of the facts provided by the taxpayer upon which
the secretary reasonably relied.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-51-722 is repealed.
26-51-722. Effective date.
The provisions of this Act shall be applicable to all income earned or
accrued in the income years, both calendar and fiscal, beginning on or after
January 1, 1961.

SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective for tax years
beginning on and after January 1, 2026.




03/26/2025 2:53:52 PM JLL351